Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.061

Board—Authority.

In addition to any authority provided by law, the board shall have the following authority:

(1) To adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and administration of examinations for licensure;

(3) To conduct a hearing on an appeal of a denial of license based on the applicant's failure to meet the minimum qualifications for licensure. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW;

(4) To establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure;

(5) To adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program;

(6) To issue subpoenas, statements of charges, statements of intent to deny licenses, and orders, and to delegate in writing to a designee to issue subpoenas; and

(7) To issue temporary license permits under circumstances defined by the board.

[ 1992 c 53 s 6.]